District of Columbia statutes.
1-620.35

Procedure and employee impact.

(a)

A drug and alcohol testing policy, including the notice required by § 1-620.32(d), shall be issued at least 30 days in advance of implementing the drug and alcohol program to inform District employees of the requirements of the program and to allow each employee one opportunity to seek treatment, if he or she has a drug or alcohol problem. Thereafter, any confirmed positive drug test results, positive breathalyser test, or a refusal to submit to a drug test or breathalyser shall be grounds for termination of employment in accordance with this chapter.

(b)

The testing program shall be implemented as a single program.

(c)

The results of a random test conducted pursuant to this subchapter shall not be turned over to any law enforcement agency without the employee’s written consent.

(d)

An applicant may be offered employment contingent upon receipt of a satisfactory drug testing result, and may begin working in a position that is not a safety-sensitive position prior to receiving the results.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 2035
as added Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-353, § 102, 52 DCR 2331
For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 102 of the Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Temporary Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Law 14-164, June 25, 2002, law notification 49 DCR 6500).
For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 102 of the Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Temporary Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Law 15-2, May 3, 2003, law notification 50 DCR 3782).
For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 102 of the Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Temporary Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Law 15-117, March 30, 2004, law notification 51 DCR 3804).
For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 102 of the Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Second Temporary Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Law 15-319, April 8, 2005, law notification 52 DCR 4708).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 102 of Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-310, March 26, 2002, 49 DCR 3420).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 102 of Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Emergency Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-3, January 22, 2003, 50 DCR 1426).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 102 of Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-71, April 16, 2003, 50 DCR 3593).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 102 of Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Second Emergency Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-279, December 18, 2003, 51 DCR 60).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 102 of Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-407, March 18, 2004, 51 DCR 3659).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 102 of Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-630, November 30, 2004, 52 DCR 1143).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 102 of Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-30, February 17, 2005, 52 DCR 2993).